Utah statutes.
9-12-104.   Guidelines for private contributions -- Assuring equitable distribution.

The department shall coordinate with private contributors to home energy assistance programs, such as REACH and Lend-a-Hand to help assure equitable statewide distribution of assistance to eligible customers of all vendors of energy services.

